Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 3 Wyoming Boys' School

Cross references. —

As to general supervision and control by department of corrections, see §

25-1-104

.

For constitutional provision as to the establishment of charitable and penal institutions under the supervision of the state board of charities and reform, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to public health and safety relative to state institutions generally, see title 35.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, subsection 021, directs the department of audit through the school finance section, to conduct an audit of educational services provided at the Wyoming boys' school and the Wyoming girls' school, which is to include a review of funds made available for educational services at these institutions during school year 2004-2005, the educational services provided during this same period of time and recommendations for future funding and service levels. Audit findings are to be reported to the joint appropriations interim committee on or before December 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided in art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

§ 25-3-101.
Persons to be confined; notice; transportation to school.

Any boy who has attained the age of twelve (12) years and who has been ordered committed in compliance with W.S.

14-6-229

may be committed to the Wyoming boys’ school. The term of any boy committed shall be determined by the department of family services.

Any person may be sentenced or transferred to the boys’ school pursuant to W.S.

7-13-101

.

After a person is committed or sentenced to the Wyoming boys’ school the clerk of court shall notify the department of family services and the superintendent of the institution. The department of family services shall arrange for transportation.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 63, §§ 6 to 8; C.S. 1920, §§ 624 to 626; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-908 to 108-910; C.S. 1945, §§ 19-1306 to 19-1308; Laws 1955, ch. 183, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-402 to 9-404; Laws 1965, ch. 75, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-6-306 to 9-6-308; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1987, ch. 217, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to sentencing of minors to boys' school upon first conviction of felony, see §

7-13-101

.

As to conveyance of prisoners to penitentiary or penal institutions, see §

7-13-103

.

The 2007 amendment,

in (b) deleted “and

7-13-102

.” from the end of the sentence.

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “The 1951 Juvenile Court Law of Wyoming,” see VIII Wyo. L.J. 173.

§ 25-3-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 200, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1941, ch. 26, § 1, related to segregation of residents under the age of sixteen.

§ 25-3-103.
Discipline to be reformatory; employment of residents; sale of products for public use or in open market; disposition of proceeds.

The discipline in the Wyoming boys’ school shall be reformatory. Residents of the school may be employed as a means of their support and reformation.

All articles manufactured and produced, or all agricultural products grown by or through the labor of residents of the school not required for use of the school, may be furnished to:

The state;

Any public institution owned, managed or controlled by the state;

The transportation commission for use on any roads or highways;

The county authorities of any county.

The department of family services shall fix the prices of the articles and products which shall be paid upon requisition of the proper officials. The department may sell in the open market or any other manner any or all products grown or produced by residents within or without the boys’ school that are not sold for public use.

All monies received by the department from the sale of products manufactured, produced or grown by the residents of the boys’ school shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 63, § 9; 1917, ch. 116, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 627; R.S. 1931, § 108-911; C.S. 1945, § 19-1310; W.S. 1957, § 9-406; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-310; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 241, § 3.

§ 25-3-104.
Transfer of residents to state hospital; rules and regulations governing residents.

The department of family services may, with the approval of the department of health, transfer any resident who becomes mentally incompetent to any appropriate acute placement facility based on a psychiatric evaluation.

The department shall make all rules and regulations necessary and proper for:

Employment, discipline, instruction and education of residents;

Mental and physical health and welfare of residents;

Transfer and return of residents; and

Work release for residents who are not subject to home visitation or temporary residence outside the school enclosure.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 63, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 628; Laws 1927, ch. 49, § 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-903, 108-912; C.S. 1945, §§ 19-1102, 19-1311; Laws 1947, ch. 15, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-396, 9-407; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-6-202, 9-6-311; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “any appropriate acute placement facility based on a psychiatric evaluation” for “the Wyoming state hospital” in (a).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b)(iv), deleted “W.S.

7-16-301

through

7-16-311

.”

Transfer to penitentiary not change of sentence. —

A person sentenced since the passage of this section is sentenced subject to the provisions of this section; hence, the transfer of a resident from the industrial institute (now boys' school) to the state penitentiary is not a change of sentence but rather the carrying out of the original sentence. Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

§ 25-3-105.
Control over residents; preparation of personal record; rehabilitation plan and periodic reviews thereof; contents of record.

The department of family services shall maintain control over all persons committed to the boys’ school to prevent the persons from committing crime, best secure their self-support and accomplish their reformation. When a person is admitted to the school, the superintendent shall prepare a record of the personal history of the resident, including his age, family and social background, education and prior training and employment. Based upon all pertinent information available, the superintendent shall prepare an individualized rehabilitation plan which shall be part of the resident’s record. Periodic reviews of the resident’s progress and appropriate modifications of his rehabilitation plan shall be made by the superintendent and entered on the resident’s record. The status of each resident shall be reported to him periodically. All orders affecting the resident, the circumstance of his final release and any new developments concerning his personal history shall be included in his record.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 63, § 12; C.S. 1920, § 630; R.S. 1931, § 108-913; C.S. 1945, § 19-1312; W.S. 1957, § 9-408; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-312; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The 1951 Juvenile Court Law of Wyoming,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 173.

For comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).

§ 25-3-106.
Release of resident.

After the department of family services has made a finding that a boy should be released from the Wyoming boys’ school, it shall give advance notification of the pending release to the court which ordered commitment. Upon the boy’s release the department shall issue him an administrative discharge.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 63, § 13; 1915, ch. 109, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 631; R.S. 1931, § 108-914; Laws 1937, ch. 60, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 19-1313; W.S. 1957, § 9-409; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-313; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 181, § 1; 1987, ch. 217, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).